src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_rastagas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - rástágâš: # MLO, ok
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Nom: rástágâš
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Gen: rástágáá
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Acc: rástágáá
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Ill: rástágâžân
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Loc: rástágáást
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Com: rástágáin
    rástágâš+N+Sg+Abe: rástágááttáá
    rástágâš+N+Ess: rástágâžžân
    rástágâš+N+Par: rástágâžžâd
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Nom: rástágááh
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Gen: rástágái
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Acc: rástágáid
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Ill: rástágáid
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Loc: rástágáin
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Com: [rástágáiguin, rástágáigijn]
    rástágâš+N+Pl+Abe: rástágáittáá

  Noun - ruvduhâš: # MLO, ok
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Nom: ruvduhâš
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Gen: ruvduháá
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Acc: ruvduháá
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Ill: ruvduhâžân
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Loc: ruvduháást
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Com: ruvduháin
    ruvduhâš+N+Sg+Abe: ruvduhááttáá
    ruvduhâš+N+Ess: ruvduhâžžân
    ruvduhâš+N+Par: ruvduhâžžâd
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Nom: ruvduhááh
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Gen: ruvduhái
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Acc: ruvduháid
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Ill: ruvduháid
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Loc: ruvduháin
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Com: [ruvduháiguin, ruvduháigijn]
    ruvduhâš+N+Pl+Abe: ruvduháittáá
    
  Noun - jyemehâš: # MLO, ok
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Nom: jyemehâš
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Gen: jyemeháá
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Acc: jyemeháá
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Ill: jyemehâžân
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Loc: jyemeháást
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Com: jyemeháin
    jyemehâš+N+Sg+Abe: jyemehááttáá
    jyemehâš+N+Ess: jyemehâžžân
    jyemehâš+N+Par: jyemehâžžâd
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Nom: jyemehááh
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Gen: jyemehái
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Acc: jyemeháid
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Ill: jyemeháid
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Loc: jyemeháin
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Com: [jyemeháiguin, jyemeháigijn]
    jyemehâš+N+Pl+Abe: jyemeháittáá
    
  Noun - umogâš: # MLO, ok
    umogâš+N+Sg+Nom: umogâš
    umogâš+N+Sg+Gen: umogáá
    umogâš+N+Sg+Acc: umogáá
    umogâš+N+Sg+Ill: umogâžân
    umogâš+N+Sg+Loc: umogáást
    umogâš+N+Sg+Com: umogáin
    umogâš+N+Sg+Abe: umogááttáá
    umogâš+N+Ess: umogâžžân
    umogâš+N+Par: umogâžžâd
    umogâš+N+Pl+Nom: umogááh
    umogâš+N+Pl+Gen: umogái
    umogâš+N+Pl+Acc: umogáid
    umogâš+N+Pl+Ill: umogáid
    umogâš+N+Pl+Loc: umogáin
    umogâš+N+Pl+Com: [umogáiguin, umogáigijn]
    umogâš+N+Pl+Abe: umogáittáá
